Hawaii statutes.
[§327-7] Refusal to make an anatomical gift
and effect of refusal. (a) An individual may refuse to make an anatomical
gift of the individual's body or body part by:

(1) A record signed by:

(A) The individual; or

(B) Subject to subsection (b), another
individual acting at the direction of the individual if the individual is
physically unable to sign;

(2) The individual's will whether or not the will is
admitted to probate or invalidated after the individual's death; or

(3) Any form of communication made by the individual
during the individual's terminal illness or injury addressed to at least two
other individuals who are at least eighteen years of age, one of whom is a
disinterested witness.

(b) A record signed pursuant to subsection
(a)(1)(B) shall:

(1) Be witnessed by at least two other individuals
who are at least eighteen years of age, one of whom is a disinterested witness,
who have signed at the request of the individual; and

(2) State that it has been signed and witnessed as
provided in paragraph (1).

(c) An individual may amend or revoke a
refusal:

(1) In the manner provided in subsection (a) for
making a refusal;

(2) By subsequently making an anatomical gift
pursuant to section 327-5 that is inconsistent with the refusal; or

(3) By the destruction or cancellation of the record
evidencing the refusal, or the portion of the record used to make the refusal,
with the intent to revoke the refusal.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in section
327-8(h), in the absence of an express, contrary indication by the individual
set forth in the refusal, an individual's unrevoked refusal to make an
anatomical gift of the individual's body or a body part bars all other persons
from making an anatomical gift of the individual's body or the body part. [L
2008, c 122, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next